Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-628.03
Benefits; disqualification; student.

(1) An individual shall be disqualified for benefits for any week of unemployment if such individual is a student unless the major portion of his or her wages for insured work during his or her base period was for services performed while attending school. Attendance at a school, college, or university for training purposes, under a plan approved by the commissioner for such individual, shall not be disqualifying.

(2) For purposes of this section, student means an individual who is registered for full-time status at and regularly attends an established school, college, university, training facility, or other educational institution or who is on vacation during or between two successive academic years or terms.

Laws 2017, LB172, § 33.